Maine, session 132, LD1720.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Maine as follows:
Sec. 1. 5 MRSA §285, sub-§1, ¶L, as amended by PL 2023, c. 20, §2, is further
amended to read:
L. Any employee of an academy approved for tuition purposes in accordance with
Title 20‑A, sections 2951 to 2955; and
Sec. 2. 5 MRSA §285, sub-§1, ¶M, as enacted by PL 2023, c. 20, §3, is amended
to read:
M. A retired county or municipal law enforcement officer or retired municipal
firefighter who meets the requirements for coverage under subsection 11‑A.; and
Sec. 3. 5 MRSA §285, sub-§1, ¶N is enacted to read:
N. A nurse, certified nursing assistant, direct care worker, other qualified health care
professional or ancillary support worker including housekeeping and dietary staff
employed by a nursing home licensed under Title 22, chapter 405 or a residential care
facility licensed under Title 22, chapter 1664.
Sec. 4. 5 MRSA §17001, sub-§14, ¶A, as amended by PL 1987, c. 402, Pt. A,
§§64 and 65, is further amended to read:
A. For purposes of this chapter, a state employee, including any person serving during
any probationary period required under the Civil Service Law and rules of the Civil
Service Appeals Board, a teacher or a participating local district employee or a long-
term care worker;
Sec. 5. 5 MRSA §17001, sub-§19-C is enacted to read:
19-C. Long-term care worker. "Long-term care worker" means a nurse, certified
nursing assistant, direct care worker, other qualified health care professional or ancillary
support worker including housekeeping and dietary staff employed by a nursing home
licensed under Title 22, chapter 405 or a residential care facility licensed under Title 22,
chapter 1664.
Sec. 6. 22 MRSA §1708, sub-§3, ¶E, as amended by PL 2013, c. 594, §1, is further
amended by amending subparagraph (2) to read:
(2) Uses the applicable regional inflation factor as established by a national
economic research organization selected by the department to adjust costs other
than labor costs or fixed costs; and
Sec. 7. 22 MRSA §1708, sub-§3, ¶F, as amended by PL 2021, c. 29, Pt. R, §1, is
further amended by amending the first blocked paragraph to read:
Any rebasing done pursuant to this paragraph may not result in a nursing facility
receiving a reimbursement rate that is lower than the rate in effect on June 30, 2018.;
Sec. 8. 22 MRSA §1708, sub-§3, ¶G is enacted to read:
G. Ensure that the actual costs of training provided to nursing facility staff in a certified
nursing assistant training program, a direct care worker training program and an
English as a second language training for a staff member who is a nonnative English
speaker are fully reimbursed; and
Page 1 - 132LR2295(01)

Sec. 9. 22 MRSA §1708, sub-§3, ¶H is enacted to read:
H. Ensure that the actual costs of interpreter services for nursing facility staff and
residents who require language assistance are fully reimbursed, including expenses for
on-site interpreters, remote interpreting services and interpreter-related administrative
costs.
Sec. 10. 22 MRSA §3174-PPP is enacted to read:
§3174-PPP. Reimbursement for workforce training and interpreter services for
private nonmedical institutions classified as residential care facilities
The department shall reimburse under the MaineCare program for private nonmedical
institutions the actual costs of staff training for a certified nursing assistant training
program, a direct caregiver training program and English as a second language training for
a staff member who is a nonnative English speaker and the actual costs of interpreter
services for staff and residents who require language assistance, including expenses for on-
site interpreters, remote interpreting services and interpreter-related administrative costs.
Sec. 11. Department of Professional and Financial Regulation to offer
certified nursing assistant examinations in several languages. The Department of
Professional and Financial Regulation shall collaborate with experts and relevant
stakeholders to improve access to certification for persons who do not speak English by
offering, at a minimum, the certified nursing assistant written examination under the Maine
Revised Statutes, Title 32, chapter 31 in French, Spanish, Cantonese, Mandarin and
Filipino, ensuring the accuracy and cultural appropriateness of the translations. The
department shall develop and make available written examinations under this section by
January 1, 2026.